District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.08

Trustee’s right to information.

A trustee shall have the right to receive from a statutory trust or another trustee information relating to the affairs of the trust which is reasonably related to the trustee’s discharge of the trustee’s duties as trustee. The trustee may enforce this right by summary proceeding in the Superior Court.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1201.04 and § 29-1206.14.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 508 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.